District of Columbia statutes.
47-214

Schedule of funds available from federal and private grants.

Along with, and in addition to, all other financial and budgetary information and data which the Mayor of the District of Columbia is required annually to submit to the Office of Management and Budget by 31 U.S.C. § 1108(b)(1) , the Mayor shall prepare and submit to that Office a schedule showing an estimate of all funds which will be available to any agency, department, or instrumentality of the District of Columbia government, during the fiscal year for which such financial and budgetary information and data are submitted, for grants from any federal agency, department, or instrumentality, or from any private source. Such schedule shall include such additional information as the Office of Management and Budget deems necessary and appropriate to fully indicate the purposes for which such grants will be made, the scope of the programs funded by such grants, and the relationship between the grant funded programs and the programs of such agency, department, or instrumentality funded by money appropriated directly to the District of Columbia. Such schedule, and such additional information as the Office of Management and Budget may include, shall be transmitted to the Congress along with the annual budget request from the District of Columbia government.

History

Dec. 15, 1971, 85 Stat. 656, Pub. L. 92-196, title VII, § 703
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-214.
1973 Ed., § 47-211a.